Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Supplement, 201717-502
Seal; other powers.

Each city of the second class or village shall have a common seal, which it may change and alter at pleasure, and such other powers as may be conferred by law.

Laws 1879, § 56, p. 207;

R.S.1913, § 5080;

Laws 1917, c. 100, § 1, p. 264;

C.S.1922, § 4252;

C.S.1929, § 17-401;

Laws 1933, c. 29, § 1, p. 206;

Laws 1935, Spec. Sess., c. 10, § 6, p. 75;

Laws 1937, c. 30, § 1, p. 153;

Laws 1941, c. 25, § 1, p. 120;

Laws 1941, c. 130, § 14, p. 498;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 17-401;

Laws 1943, c. 34, § 1, p. 153;

R.S.1943, § 17-502;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 118.